Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB524.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part II heading of Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:PART IIADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS[(Reserved)]Section 2. Part II of Title 27 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 21PENNSYLVANIA ENERGY INDEPENDENCESec.123456789101112131415161718192021 2101. Definitions.2102. Coal-powered plants.2103. Regulations.2104. Natural gas and coal permit database.2105. Natural gas and coal permit review procedure.2106. Withdrawal from Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative.§ 2101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Coal-powered plant." A facility that burns coal to make steam in order to generate electricity."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth.§ 2102. Coal-powered plants.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Tenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States guarantees to the states and their people all powers not granted to the Federal Government elsewhere in the Constitution and reserves to the State and the people of Pennsylvania certain powers as they were understood at the time that Pennsylvania was admitted into Statehood in 1787.(2) The guaranty of those powers is a matter of contract between the State and the people of Pennsylvania and the United States as of the time that the compact with the United States was agreed upon and adopted by Pennsylvania and the United States in 1787.(3) The Ninth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States guarantees to the people rights not granted in 20250SB0524PN0498 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Constitution of the United States and reserves to the people of Pennsylvania certain rights as they were understood at the time that Pennsylvania was admitted into Statehood in 1787.(4) The guaranty of those rights is a matter of contract between the State and people of Pennsylvania and the United States as of the time that the compact with the United States was agreed upon and adopted by Pennsylvania and the United States in 1787.(5) The regulation of intrastate commerce, including the natural environment as affected by intrastate business, is vested in the states under the Ninth and Tenth Amendments to the Constitution of the United States and is specifically retained by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(6) The regulation of the transportation and disposal of hazardous waste, of the release of emissions, substances and pollutants into the air in this Commonwealth, of the release of pollutants into bodies of water in this Commonwealth, of public water supplies in this Commonwealth, of wastewater systems in this Commonwealth and the regulation of production, exploration, drilling, development, operation, transportation, processing and energy generation of coal, coal products and materials or substances used in the production, exploration, drilling, development, operation, transportation, processing and energy generation of coal that originate and remain inside this Commonwealth and have not been proven and adjudicated by Federal court systems or this Commonwealth's court systems to specifically be causing, or to have caused, quantifiable harm to any person, business or place beyond the borders of Pennsylvania shall be intrastate 20250SB0524PN0498 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commerce and shall not be subject to Federal law or regulation under the authority of the United States Congress to regulate interstate commerce.(b) Exemption.--A coal-powered plant in this Commonwealth shall be exempt from the rules and regulations of the Environmental Protection Agency, to include:(1) 40 CFR Ch. 1 Subch. N Pt. 423 (relating to Steam Electric Power Generating Point Source Category).(2) The Cross-State Air Pollution Rule under 40 CFR Ch. 1 Subch. C (relating to air programs).(c) Authority of department.--The department shall have the exclusive power and duty to regulate natural gas and coal that are extracted and used in this Commonwealth.§ 2103. Regulations.(a) Authorization.--The department shall issue a report to the General Assembly, within six months of the effective date of this subsection, that identifies all current Federal and State regulations affecting the natural gas and coal industries and the respective economic impact of the rules and regulations.(b) Approval.--In addition to the procedure required by the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, a regulation promulgated after the effective date of this subsection that in any way affects the natural gas and coal industries must be approved by a majority vote in the General Assembly and approved by the Governor.§ 2104. Natural gas and coal permit database.The department shall establish and maintain, on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, a database of natural gas and coal permit applications and permits. The database shall include:20250SB0524PN0498 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Information about natural gas and coal permits that the department has granted.(2) A tracking system for persons that have applied for natural gas or coal permits to check on the status of the applications.(3) If the department rejects an application for a natural gas or coal permit, the legal authority for the rejection.§ 2105. Natural gas and coal permit review procedure.(a) Third-party contractor.--The department may enter into a contract with a third party for the review of applications submitted for natural gas or coal permits.(b) Time period for review.--The department shall conclude review of a completed application for a natural gas or coal permit within 45 days of receipt. If the department fails to render a decision within the 45-day period, the application shall be deemed approved if the administratively complete application is accompanied by an affidavit executed under penalty of perjury by a professional engineer, landscape architect, geologist or land surveyor licensed by the Commonwealth affirming that:(1) the contents of the application are true and correct to the best of the individual's knowledge, information and belief; and(2) the requirements for issuance of the individual permit or for coverage or authorization to proceed under the general plan approval or general permit stated in all applicable environmental laws have been satisfied.§ 2106. Withdrawal from Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative.The Commonwealth withdraws its entry into the Regional 20250SB0524PN0498 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Greenhouse Gas Initiative.Section 3. Section 3211(d) of Title 58 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3211. Well permits.* * *(d) Permit fee.--Each application for a well permit shall be accompanied by a permit fee, established by the Environmental Quality Board, which bears a reasonable relationship to the cost of administering this chapter[.], provided that the fee may not exceed:(1) The amount of $4,200 for a vertical unconventional well.(2) The amount of $5,000 for a nonvertical unconventional well.* * *(n) Future modifications.--Any future modification to the vertical or nonvertical unconventional well permit fee must be approved by an act of the General Assembly.Section 4. Title 58 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3228. Leases in State parks and forests.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Governor may not impose, through executive order or other action, a moratorium on the Commonwealth from entering into leases for natural gas and oil development in State parks and forests.(b) Existing moratorium.--Executive Order 2015-03 issued by the Governor on January 29, 2015, published at 45 Pa.B. 766 (February 14, 2015), is void and shall have no force or effect in law.Section 5. This act shall take effect as follows:20250SB0524PN0498 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The addition of 27 Pa.C.S. § 2106 shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0524PN0498 - 7 - 12345